Illinois, session 104th, HB4669.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Designations Act is amended by adding 5Sections 110 and 115 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 460/110 new)7    Sec. 110. State sandwich. The Italian beef sandwich is 8designated as the official State sandwich of the State of 9Illinois. 10    (5 ILCS 460/115 new)11    Sec. 115. State open-faced sandwich. The horseshoe 12sandwich is designated as the official State open-faced 13sandwich of the State of Illinois.